Utah statutes.
17-2-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Annexing county" means the county to which a portion of an adjoining county is annexed or proposed to be annexed as provided in this part.

(2)  "Initiating county" means the county, from which a portion is annexed or proposed to be annexed to an adjoining county.

